Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2604
Packers; acts prohibited.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a packer shall not:

(a) Directly or indirectly own, control, or operate a livestock operation in this state; or

(b) Directly or indirectly be engaged in the ownership, keeping, or feeding of livestock, other than temporary ownership, keeping, and feeding not to exceed fourteen days which is necessary and incidental to, and immediately prior to, the process of slaughter.

(2) Subdivision (1)(b) of this section does not apply to the ownership, keeping, or feeding of swine by a packer at one or more contract swine operations in this state if the packer does not own, keep, or feed swine in this state except for the purpose of the slaughtering of swine or the manufacturing or preparation of carcasses of swine or goods originating from the carcasses in one or more processing facilities owned or controlled by the packer. Any agreement that establishes such a contract swine operation shall be subject to section 54-2604.01.

(3) For purposes of this section, indirectly own, control, or operate a livestock operation and indirectly be engaged in the ownership, keeping, or feeding of livestock includes:

(a) Receiving the net revenue or a share of the net revenue derived from a livestock operation or from a person who contracts for the care and feeding of livestock in this state, unless the packer is not involved in the management of the livestock operation;

(b) Assuming a morbidity or mortality production risk if the livestock are fed or otherwise maintained as part of a livestock operation in this state, unless the packer is not involved in the management of the livestock operation; and

(c) Loaning money for or guaranteeing, acting as a surety for, or otherwise financing a livestock operation in this state or a person who contracts for the care and feeding of livestock in this state. For purposes of this subdivision, loaning money for or guaranteeing, acting as a surety for, or otherwise financing a livestock operation does not include executing a contract for the purchase of livestock by a packer, including, but not limited to, forward contracts, marketing agreements, long-term arrangements, formula arrangements, other noncash sales arrangements, contracts that contain a ledger balance unsecured by collateral of the debtor or other price-risk-sharing arrangements, or providing an open account or loan unsecured by collateral of the debtor or a ledger balance or loan secured by collateral of the debtor so long as the amount due from the debtor does not exceed one million dollars.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB176, § 3.